Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 32 Eye Care Practitioners

Cross references. —

As to licensing generally, see chapter 1 of this title.

§ 33-32-101.
Interference with selection of eye care practitioners prohibited.

No person, department, commission, board, official, employee, or agency of the state of Wyoming or any county, municipality, school district or other subdivision of the state of Wyoming, or any other state or county agency or any other governmental unit of any kind or character shall interfere with any patient’s exercise of freedom of choice in the selection of practitioners licensed to perform examinations for refractions and visual training and visual corrections within the specific area for which their state licenses entitle them to practice.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 45, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-386.

Cross references. —

As to optometrists, see chapter 23 of this title.